Maryland, session 2026, HB0930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
3–309.
THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT ELECT TO PARTICIPATE IN THE TAX CREDIT
PROGRAM FOR QUALIFIED ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION
SCHOLARSHIPS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 25F OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–204.
(a) To the extent excluded from federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are added to the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(M) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY
AMOUNT PAID BY AN EMPLOYER AS A CONTRIBUTION TO A TRUMP ACCOUNT AND
EXCLUDED FROM THE GROSS INCOME OF AN EMPLOYEE UNDER § 128 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
10–205.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–204 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are added to the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(h) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Account holder” means an account holder as defined in §
18–1901, § 18–19A–01, or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.

HOUSE BILL 930 3
(iii) “Qualified beneficiary” has the meaning stated in § 18–1901 of
the Education Article.
(iv) “Qualified designated beneficiary” means a qualified designated
beneficiary as defined in § 18–19A–01 or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.
(v) 1. “Qualified higher education expenses” has the meaning
stated in § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.
2. “QUALIFIED HIGHER EDUCATION EXPENSES” DOES
NOT INCLUDE EXPENSES IDENTIFIED UNDER § 529(C)(7) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(2) The addition under subsection (a) of this section includes the amount
of:
(i) any refund received in the taxable year by an account holder
under a prepaid contract in accordance with the Maryland Senator Edward J. Kasemeyer
Prepaid College Trust; or
(ii) any distribution received in the taxable year by an account
holder under a prepaid contract in accordance with the Maryland Senator Edward J.
Kasemeyer Prepaid College Trust or under an investment account in accordance with the
Maryland Senator Edward J. Kasemeyer College Investment Plan or the Maryland
Broker–Dealer College Investment Plan that is not used on behalf of the qualified
beneficiary or qualified designated beneficiary for qualified higher education expenses.
(3) The amount of the addition required under this subsection shall be
reduced by any amount included in the individual’s federal adjusted gross income as a
result of the refund or distribution.
(4) The cumulative amount of the addition under this subsection for the
taxable year and all prior taxable years may not exceed the cumulative amount allowed as
a subtraction:
(i) under § 10–208(n) of this subtitle for the taxable year and all
prior taxable years for the account holder’s payments to the prepaid contract under which
the refund or distribution is received; or
(ii) under § 10–208(o) of this subtitle for the taxable year and all
prior taxable years for contributions made by an account holder to an investment account
under which the distribution is received.
10–208.

HOUSE BILL 930
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
(o) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Account holder” means an account holder as defined in §
18–19A–01 or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.
(iii) “Contributor” means an individual who contributes funds to a
Maryland Senator Edward J. Kasemeyer College Investment Plan or Broker–Dealer
College Investment Plan account under Title 18, Subtitle 19A or Subtitle 19B of the
Education Article.
(iv) “Investment account” means an investment account as defined
in § 18–19A–01 or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.
(v) “Qualified designated beneficiary” means a qualified designated
beneficiary as defined in § 18–19A–01 or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph and
subject to the limitation under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the subtraction under
subsection (a) of this section includes the amount contributed by an account holder or a
contributor during the taxable year to an investment account.
(ii) The subtraction under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may
not be taken if:
1. the account holder received a State contribution under §
18–19A–04.1 of the Education Article during the taxable year; OR
2. THE FUNDS CONTRIBUTED TO A COLLEGE
INVESTMENT PLAN ESTABLISHED UNDER § 529 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
ARE USED FOR ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY EDUCATION EXPENSES AS DESCRIBED
IN § 529(C)(7) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(3) (i) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, for each account
holder or contributor for all investment accounts maintained in the Maryland Senator
Edward J. Kasemeyer College Investment Plan and the Maryland Broker–Dealer College
Investment Plan for the same qualified designated beneficiary, the subtraction under
paragraph (2) of this subsection may not exceed $2,500 for any taxable year per qualified
designated beneficiary.
(ii) For purposes of the limitation under this paragraph, each spouse
on a joint return shall be treated separately.

HOUSE BILL 930 5
(4) Subject to the $2,500 annual limitation for each account holder or
contributor for each qualified designated beneficiary, the amount disallowed as a
subtraction under this subsection for any taxable year as a result of the limitation under
paragraph (3) of this subsection may be carried over until used to the next 10 succeeding
taxable years as a subtraction.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and Section 2 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.